Utah statutes.
20A-2-101.5.   Convicted felons -- Restoration of right to vote and right to hold office.

(1)  As used in this section, "convicted felon" means a person convicted of a felony in any state or federal court of the United States.

(2)  Each convicted felon's right to register to vote and to vote in an election is restored when:

(a)  the felon is sentenced to probation;

(b)  the felon is granted parole; or

(c)  the felon has successfully completed the term of incarceration to which the felon was sentenced.

(3)  Except as provided by Subsection (4), a convicted felon's right to hold elective office is restored when:

(a)  all of the felon's felony convictions have been expunged; or

(b) (i)  10 years have passed since the date of the felon's most recent felony conviction;

(ii)  the felon has paid all court-ordered restitution and fines; and

(iii)  for each felony conviction that has not been expunged, the felon has:

(A)  completed probation in relation to the felony;

(B)  been granted parole in relation to the felony; or

(C)  successfully completed the term of incarceration associated with the felony.

(4)  An individual who has been convicted of a grievous sexual offense, as defined in Section 76-1-601, against a child, may not hold the office of State Board of Education member or local school board member.



Amended by Chapter 263, 2013 General Session

